Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201281-1108.33
State building division;
Task Force for Building Renewal; reviews required; report; approval; when
required.

(1) It is the intent of the Legislature that the
state will not assume responsibility for the substandard construction, repair,
or maintenance of, or for the excessive maintenance or repair costs for, real
property, structures, or improvements which will be made available by gift,
bequest, or devise to any state
agency, board, or commission or real
property or structures acquired by
any state agency, board, or commission with the proceeds of donations,
gifts, bequests, devises, or grants from individuals, organizations, corporations,
foundations, or similar entities or from nonfederal governmental agencies. Therefor, any
such gift, bequest, devise, or acquisition of such real property, structure,
or improvement shall be reviewed and approved as provided in this section as
a requirement for acceptance or acquisition by the state of such real property,
structure, or improvement.

(2)(a) Any gift of, bequest of, or devise of real property, a structure,
or an improvement proposed to be made available to any state agency, board,
or commission in excess of
ten thousand dollars and any acquisition of real property or structures with the proceeds
of donations, gifts, bequests, devises, or
grants from individuals, organizations, corporations, foundations, or similar
entities or from nonfederal governmental agencies, if the combined proceeds
of such donations, gifts, bequests, devises, or grants exceed two hundred
fifty thousand dollars, shall be reviewed by the state building
division and the Task Force for Building Renewal pursuant to sections 81-176,
81-1108.15, and 81-1114. Such review shall include any potential matching
of state funds, any plans, specifications, and other construction or repair
documents, and any potential maintenance requirements as a
condition of acceptance or acquisition. Subsequent to such review, the state
building division and the task force shall submit a report to the Governor,
the Committee on Building Maintenance, and the Legislative Fiscal Analyst
including a summary of the review of the plans, specifications, and other
construction or repair documents and potential maintenance requirements and
outlining the terms and conditions of the proposed gift, bequest, devise,
or acquisition along with its recommendation. The report submitted to the committee and the Legislative
Fiscal Analyst shall be submitted electronically.

(b)(i) Any
proposed gift of, bequest of, or devise of real property, a structure, or
an improvement in excess of ten thousand dollars shall be approved by the
Governor and the Legislature prior to acceptance.

(ii) Any acquisition of real property or structures with the proceeds
of donations, gifts, bequests, devises, or
grants from individuals, organizations, corporations, foundations, or similar
entities or from nonfederal governmental agencies, if the combined proceeds
of such donations, gifts, bequests, devises, or grants exceed two hundred
fifty thousand dollars, shall be approved by the Governor and
Legislature prior to such acquisition.

(iii) If the Legislature is
not in session, the Executive Board of the Legislative Council, after recommendation
by the Committee on Building Maintenance, may approve such gift, bequest,
devise, or acquisition along with the Governor.

(c) No construction,
repair, maintenance, or other work related to the proposed gift,
bequest, devise, or acquisition shall be initiated prior to receiving the review and approval required
by this section.

(3) For purposes of this section, gift of, bequest of, or devise of
(a) real property, (b) a structure, or (c) an improvement shall include, but
not be limited to, a donation of, gift of, bequest of, devise of, or grant
of (i) real property, (ii) a structure, or (iii) an improvement from an individual,
an organization, a corporation, a foundation, or a similar entity or from
a nonfederal governmental agency. For purposes of this section, gift, bequest,
or devise shall not include a donation, gift, bequest, devise, or grant of
tangible or intangible personal property.

(4) This section shall not apply to the University of Nebraska or any
Nebraska state college, since these agencies are subject to and participate
in statewide facilities planning developed by the Coordinating Commission
for Postsecondary Education pursuant to the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary
Education Act.

Laws 1995, LB 530, § 13;

Laws 1999, LB 369, § 3;

Laws 2006, LB 1038, § 2;

Laws 2008, LB1116, § 8;

Laws 2011, LB264, § 4;

Laws 2012, LB761, § 2;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 183.

Committee on Building Maintenance, see section 81-185.

Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education, see Article VII, section 14, Constitution of Nebraska and section 85-1403.

Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education Act, see section 85-1401.